Utah statutes.
53-15-202.   Program requirements.
(1)  The statewide program administrator shall:
(a)  provide support and training upon request to local law enforcement
agencies interested in implementing the program in their area;
(b)  provide local programs with signs for display in approved "safe homes";
and
(c)  maintain a register of all "safe homes" that includes, at a minimum, the
address of the home and the names of all persons living in the home.
(2)  The local program shall:
(a)  recruit volunteer "safe homes" in neighborhoods with the help of local
community groups;
(b)  provide training and education to volunteers regarding the program and
its use;
(c)  provide for an application process for volunteers;
(d)  conduct criminal history background checks on volunteers and members of
their households;
(e)  approve or disapprove applications for "safe homes";
(f)  provide education through community programs for parents and children on
the program and the proper use of "safe homes";
(g)  provide approved "safe homes" with signs for display;
(h)  provide procedures by which a "safe home" may be removed from the
register; and
(i)  provide for a method of renewal of the "safe home" designation in order
to keep the registry current and provide for the periodic review of the "safe
home", the volunteer, and all members of the household.
